Utah statutes.
70C-2-104.   Advances to perform covenants of buyer.

If a consumer credit agreement contains covenants by the debtor to perform certain duties pertaining to insuring or preserving collateral and the creditor pursuant to the agreement pays for performance of the duties on behalf of the debtor, the creditor may add the amounts paid to the unpaid principal of the debt.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

